Nebraska, session 109, LB1002.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1002 LB1002
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 49-1449, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
49-1449 (1) Each committee shall file a statement of organization
pursuant to this section and pay a registration fee pursuant to section
49-1449.01 with the commission. Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, such statement of organization shall be filed and fee paid
within ten days after a committee is formed. The commission shall
maintain a statement of organization filed by a committee until notified
of the committee's dissolution. Any person who fails to file with the
commission a statement of organization required by this subsection shall
pay to the commission a late filing fee of fifty twenty-five dollars for
each day the statement remains not filed in violation of this subsection,
not to exceed one thousand five hundred seven hundred fifty dollars.
(2) If the committee is formed within thirty days prior to an
election for which the committee exists, the statement of organization
shall be filed and registration fee paid within two business days after
the committee is formed. Any person who fails to file with the commission
a statement of organization required by this subsection shall pay to the
commission a late filing fee of two one hundred dollars for each day the
statement remains not filed in violation of this subsection, not to
exceed two one thousand dollars.
Sec. 2. Section 49-1449.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
49-1449.01 (1) At the time that each committee files its statement
of organization pursuant to section 49-1449, the committee shall pay to
the commission a registration fee of one hundred fifty dollars. The
filing of a statement of organization is not perfected unless accompanied
by the registration fee.
(2) A committee which has not perfected its filing of a statement of
organization by the date due as specified in section 49-1449 shall not
make or receive contributions or expenditures until such time as the
-2-

LB1002 LB1002
2026 2026
filing of the statement of organization is perfected, except that:
(a) A committee may make an expenditure to pay the registration fee;
and
(b) A committee may make expenditures for thirty days after the
termination of its registration if the expenditures are part of the
process of dissolving the committee and the committee dissolves within
thirty days after the termination of its registration.
(3) The registration fees collected pursuant to this section shall
be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska
Accountability and Disclosure Commission Cash Fund.
Sec. 3. Section 49-1451, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
49-1451 When any of the information required in a statement of
organization is changed, such change shall be reported when the next
campaign statement is required to be filed. Any person who fails to
report a change to the commission under this section shall pay to the
commission a late filing fee of fifty twenty-five dollars for each day
the change remains not reported in violation of this section, not to
exceed one thousand five hundred seven hundred fifty dollars.
Sec. 4. Section 49-1458, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
49-1458 (1) A committee which receives a late contribution shall
report the contribution to the commission by filing a report within two
days after the date of its receipt. The report may be filed by hand
delivery, facsimile transmission, telegraph, express delivery service, or
any other written means of communication, including electronic means
approved by the commission, and need not contain an original signature.
(2) The report shall include the full name, street address,
occupation, employer, and principal place of business of the contributor,
the amount of the contribution, and the date of receipt.
(3) A late contribution shall be reported on subsequent campaign
-3-

LB1002 LB1002
2026 2026
statements without regard to reports filed pursuant to this section.
(4) Any committee which fails to file a report of late contributions
with the commission as required by this section shall pay to the
commission a late filing fee of two one hundred dollars for each of the
first ten days the report remains not filed in violation of this section.
After the tenth day, such committee shall pay, for each day the report
remains not filed, an additional late filing fee of one percent of the
amount of the late contribution which was required to be reported, not to
exceed ten percent of the amount of the late contribution which was
required to be reported.
(5) For purposes of this section, late contribution means a
contribution of one thousand dollars or more received after the closing
date for campaign statements as provided in subdivision (1)(b) of section
49-1459.
Sec. 5. Section 49-1463, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
49-1463 (1) Any person who fails to file a campaign statement with
the commission under sections 49-1459 to 49-1463 shall pay to the
commission a late filing fee of fifty twenty-five dollars for each day
the campaign statement remains not filed in violation of this section,
not to exceed one thousand five hundred seven hundred fifty dollars.
(2) Any committee which fails to file a statement of exemption with
the commission under subsection (2) of section 49-1459 shall pay to the
commission a late filing fee of fifty twenty-five dollars for each day
the statement of exemption remains not filed in violation of this
section, not to exceed four hundred fifty two hundred twenty-five
dollars.
Sec. 6. Section 49-1467, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
49-1467 (1) Any person, other than a committee, who makes an
independent expenditure advocating the election of a candidate or the
-4-

LB1002 LB1002
2026 2026
defeat of a candidate's opponents or the qualification, passage, or
defeat of a ballot question, which is in an amount of more than two
hundred fifty dollars, shall file a report of the independent
expenditure, within ten days, with the commission.
(2) The report shall be made on an independent expenditure report
form provided by the commission and shall include the date of the
expenditure, a brief description of the nature of the expenditure, the
amount of the expenditure, the name and address of the person to whom it
was paid, the name and address of the person filing the report, and the
name, address, occupation, employer, and principal place of business of
each person who contributed more than two hundred fifty dollars to the
expenditure.
(3) Any person who fails to file a report of an independent
expenditure with the commission shall pay to the commission a late filing
fee of fifty twenty-five dollars for each day the statement remains not
filed in violation of this section, not to exceed one thousand five
hundred seven hundred fifty dollars.
(4) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class
IV misdemeanor.
Sec. 7. Section 49-1469.08, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
49-1469.08 (1) Any entity specified in subsection (1) of section
49-1469 which fails to file a report with the commission required by
section 49-1469 or 49-1469.07 shall pay to the commission a late filing
fee of fifty twenty-five dollars for each day the statement remains not
filed in violation of such sections, not to exceed one thousand five
hundred seven hundred fifty dollars.
(2) Any person who knowingly violates this section, section 49-1469,
49-1469.05, 49-1469.06, or 49-1469.07 shall be guilty of a Class III
misdemeanor.
Sec. 8. Section 49-1478.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-5-

LB1002 LB1002
2026 2026
amended to read:
49-1478.01 (1) An independent committee, including a separate
segregated political fund, which makes a late independent expenditure
shall report the expenditure to the commission by filing within two days
after the date of the expenditure the committee's full name and street
address, the amount of the expenditure, and the date of the expenditure.
The report shall include (a) the full name and street address of the
recipient of the expenditure, (b) the name and office sought of the
candidate whose nomination or election is supported or opposed by the
expenditure, and (c) the identification of the ballot question, the
qualification, passage, or defeat of which is supported or opposed.
Filing of a report of a late independent expenditure may be by any
written means of communication, including electronic means approved by
the commission, and need not contain an original signature. A late
independent expenditure shall be reported on subsequent campaign
statements without regard to reports filed pursuant to this section.
(2) A committee which fails to file a report of a late independent
expenditure with the commission as required by this section shall pay to
the commission a late filing fee of two one hundred dollars for each of
the first ten days the report remains not filed in violation of this
section. After the tenth day, such committee shall pay, for each day the
report remains not filed, an additional late filing fee of one percent of
the amount of the late independent expenditure which was required to be
reported, not to exceed ten percent of the amount of the late independent
expenditure which was required to be reported.
(3) For purposes of this section, late independent expenditure means
an independent expenditure as defined in section 49-1428 of one thousand
dollars or more made after the closing date for campaign statements as
provided in subdivision (1)(b) of section 49-1459.
Sec. 9. Section 49-1479.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-6-

LB1002 LB1002
2026 2026
49-1479.01 (1) Any contribution by a person made on behalf of or to
a candidate or committee, including contributions which are in any way
earmarked or otherwise directed to the candidate or committee through an
intermediary or agent, shall be considered to be a contribution from the
person to the candidate or committee.
(2) For purposes of this section, earmarked shall mean a
designation, instruction, or encumbrance, including those which are
direct or indirect, express or implied, or oral or written, which results
in any part of a contribution or expenditure, including any in-kind
expenditure made in exchange for a contribution, being made to or
expended on behalf of a candidate or a committee.
(3) Any intermediary or agent, other than a committee, which
receives an earmarked contribution shall forward the earmarked
contribution to the recipient candidate or committee within ten days
after receipt of such contribution.
(4) An intermediary or agent which is not a committee shall file a
report of the earmarked contribution with the commission within ten days
after receipt of the contribution. Any committee which is an intermediary
or agent shall file a report of the earmarked contribution with the
commission by the date the next campaign statement is required to be
filed. The report of the earmarked contribution filed pursuant to this
section shall be on a form prescribed by the commission.
(5) Any intermediary or agent making an earmarked contribution shall
disclose to the recipient of the earmarked contribution the name and
address of the intermediary or agent and the actual source of the
contribution by providing the recipient with a copy of the report of the
earmarked contribution at the time that the earmarked contribution is
made.
(6) Any person or committee which fails to file a report of an
earmarked contribution with the commission as required by this section
shall pay to the commission a late filing fee of fifty twenty-five
-7-

LB1002 LB1002
2026 2026
dollars for each day the statement remains not filed in violation of this
section not to exceed one thousand five hundred seven hundred fifty
dollars.
(7) Any person who knowingly violates this section shall be guilty
of a Class III misdemeanor.
Sec. 10. Section 49-1479.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
49-1479.02 (1) A major out-of-state contributor shall file with the
commission an out-of-state contribution report. An out-of-state
contribution report shall be filed on a form prescribed by the commission
within ten days after the end of the calendar month in which a person
becomes a major out-of-state contributor. For the remainder of the
calendar year, a major out-of-state contributor shall file an out-of-
state contribution report with the commission within ten days after the
end of each calendar month in which the contributor makes a contribution
or expenditure.
(2) An out-of-state contribution report shall disclose as to each
contribution or expenditure not previously reported (a) the amount,
nature, value, and date of the contribution or expenditure, (b) the name
and address of the committee, candidate, or person who received the
contribution or expenditure, (c) the name and address of the person
filing the report, and (d) the name, address, occupation, and employer of
each person making a contribution of more than two hundred dollars in the
calendar year to the person filing the report.
(3) This section shall not apply to (a) a person who files a report
of a contribution or an expenditure pursuant to subsection (2) of section
49-1469, (b) a person required to file a report or campaign statement
pursuant to section 49-1469.07, (c) a committee having a statement of
organization on file with the commission, or (d) a person or committee
registered with the Federal Election Commission.
(4) Any person who fails to file an out-of-state contribution report
-8-

LB1002 LB1002
2026 2026
with the commission as required by this section shall pay to the
commission a late filing fee of two one hundred dollars for each of the
first ten days the report remains not filed in violation of this section.
After the tenth day, such person shall pay, for each day the report
remains not filed, an additional late filing fee of one percent of the
amount of the contributions or expenditures which were required to be
reported, not to exceed ten percent of the amount of the contributions or
expenditures which were required to be reported.
Sec. 11. Section 49-1483.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
49-1483.03 (1) Any lobbyist or principal who receives or expends
more than five thousand dollars for lobbying purposes during any calendar
month in which the Legislature is in session shall, within fifteen days
after the end of such calendar month, file electronically a special
report disclosing for that calendar month all information required by
section 49-1483. All information disclosed in a special report shall also
be disclosed in the next quarterly report required to be filed. The
requirement to file a special report shall not apply to a receipt or
expenditure for lobbyist fees for lobbying services which have otherwise
been disclosed in the lobbyist's application for registration.
(2) Any lobbyist or principal who fails to file a special report
required by this section with the Clerk of the Legislature or the
commission shall pay to the commission a late filing fee of two one
hundred dollars for each of the first ten days the report remains not
filed in violation of this section. After the tenth day, such lobbyist or
principal shall pay, for each day the report remains not filed, an
additional late filing fee of one percent of the amount of the receipts
and expenditures which were required to be reported, not to exceed ten
percent of the amount of the receipts and expenditures which were
required to be reported.
Sec. 12. Section 49-1488.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
-9-

LB1002 LB1002
2026 2026
is amended to read:
49-1488.01 (1) Every lobbyist or principal who fails to file a
quarterly statement or a statement of activity with the Clerk of the
Legislature, pursuant to sections 49-1483 and 49-1488, shall pay to the
commission a late filing fee of fifty twenty-five dollars for each day
any of such statements are not filed in violation of such sections, but
not to exceed one thousand five hundred seven hundred fifty dollars per
statement.
(2) A lobbyist or principal required to pay a late filing fee
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may apply to the commission
for relief. The commission by order may reduce the amount of the late
filing fee imposed upon such lobbyist or principal if he or she shows the
commission that (a) the circumstances indicate no intent to file late,
(b) the lobbyist or principal has not been required to pay a late filing
fee for two years prior to the time the filing of the statement was due,
(c) the late filing of the statement shows that less than five thousand
dollars was raised, received, or expended during the reporting period,
and (d) a reduction of the late fee would not frustrate the purposes of
the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act.
(3) A lobbyist or principal required to pay a late filing fee
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section who qualifies for an exemption
to the filing of quarterly statements pursuant to subsection (5) of
section 49-1483 may apply to the commission for relief. The commission by
order may reduce or waive the late filing fee and the person shall not be
required to make a showing as provided by subsection (2) of this section.
Sec. 13. Original sections 49-1449, 49-1449.01, 49-1451, 49-1458,
49-1463, 49-1467, 49-1469.08, 49-1478.01, 49-1479.01, 49-1479.02,
49-1483.03, and 49-1488.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are
repealed.
-10-